District of Columbia statutes.
16-544

Property subject to attachment.

An attachment may be levied upon the judgment debtor’s goods, chattels, and credits.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-544.
1973 Ed., § 16-544.

Prior Codifications